District of Columbia statutes.
32-1605.01

Career Pathways Innovation.

(a)

Beginning in Fiscal Year 2017, and pursuant to § 32-1603(c), the Council shall issue Career Pathways Innovation grants to design, pilot, and scale best practices in the implementation of adult career pathways and improve district performance as mandated by the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, approved July 22, 2014 (128 Stat. 1425; 29 U.S.C. § 3101 et seq.), using a career pathways approach, consistent with the city-wide strategic plan developed by the Adult Career Pathways Task Force pursuant to § 32-1661.

(b)

In Fiscal Year 2016, the Council shall solicit technical assistance to prepare for the issuance of the grants authorized by subsection (a) of this section.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 6a
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2122, 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2122 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).